Wyoming, session 2025, HB0227.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-225 is created to read:

9-1-225. Executive orders; expiration.

Unless the governor issues an executive order extending a
lawfully issued executive order, executive orders issued by
the governor of this state shall expire at the end of the
HB0227

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0537
governor's term or thirty (30) days after the governor
leaves office, whichever is sooner. No executive order
shall be effective for longer than thirty (30) days after
the governor who issued the order leaves office.

Section 2. This act applies to any executive order
issued on or after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0227